Skip to main content
Discover insights from our 2025 Global Enterprise Resilience Report
Download now
Everbridge global privacy notice
LAST UPDATED: November 14, 2024
Download PDF
PLEASE READ THIS PRIVACY NOTICE CAREFULLY
This Privacy Notice describes the practices of Everbridge, Inc. (together with its subsidiaries and affiliates, “Everbridge,” “we,” “us,” and “our”) This Privacy Notice describes how we collect, process, and share your personal data, and the rights and choices that are available to you with respect to your personal data.
Privacy Notice accordingly. Changes to this Privacy Notice are effective at the time they are published, and therefore we encourage you to review this Privacy Notice from time to time. Additionally, this Privacy Notice may be supplemented or amended from time to time by other notices posted elsewhere, including on specific pages of our Platform and when you use certain Services.
This Privacy Notice is available here:
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-global-privacy-notice
.
Applicability of this Privacy Notice to Our Services
. This Privacy Notice applies to the personal data that Everbridge processes, including the personal data we collect when you interact with us in certain contexts online, for example, when you access or use our websites (including without limitation
www.everbridge.com
, manager.everbridge.net,
www.xmatters.com
,
flight-safe.com
,
www.bestinresilience.com
,
www.redskye911.com
,
www.nixle.com
, and
www.infiniteblue.com
), mobile sites, browser-based and mobile applications, platforms, and certain Everbridge products (including Everbridge Travel Protector, Everbridge Assist, Anvil Riskmatics, Infinite Blue, and Everbridge Business Continuity in the Cloud), in each case that link to this Privacy Notice (all of the foregoing collectively referred to herein as the “Platform”), or when you communicate with us via email, text message, or interact with our digital advertisements. It also includes the personal data we collect when you interact with us in certain contexts offline, for example, when you see us at conferences or trade shows, or when you communicate with our sales or support service teams in person, via phone, or by postal mail. In this Privacy Notice, we refer to the products and services we provide, both online (including via the Platform) and offline, as “Services.”
This Notice does not apply to personal data not processed by Everbridge. In some cases, our Platform processes personal data on behalf of our customers, where Everbridge acts as a service provider to our business customers (sometimes referred to as the data controller). In such case, Everbridge’s customer is the data controller, and we process your personal data in accordance with the agreement we have with the customer. If you are a client of an Everbridge customer and have questions about the privacy practices of such customer, including information we may process on their behalf, please contact them directly or refer to their privacy notice(s).
Notice of Privacy Practices for Medical Information
. Please note that certain Everbridge Services may involve the provision of health care services and the processing of your medical information. Our use and disclosure of your medical information in this context, and your rights with respect to such medical information, are described in Everbridge’s Notice of Privacy Practices for Medical Information, which is available here,
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-privacy-practices-for-medical.
Nixle Services-Specific Data Practices. The following additional terms and limitations apply to the manner in which Everbridge collects and processes personal data when you interact with or use the Everbridge Nixle Services, which may be available via mobile sites, browser-based and mobile applications, website integrations, widgets, text messages and other platforms (collectively, the “Nixle Service”) (“Nixle Personal Data”). We, our service providers, and our business partners, only process Nixle personal data for the purpose of performance of the Nixle Service, communications (including responding to anonymous tips and other messages submitted to the Nixle Service), improving the Nixle Service, personalization, security and fraud prevention, and as needed to comply with legal obligations (each as described more fully in the “How We Use Your Personal Data” section of the privacy notice below). Everbridge does not:
sell Nixle Personal Data; or
share Nixle Personal Data with third parties for their own independent use or advertising purposes.
Staff and Candidate Privacy Notices.
This Privacy Notice does not apply to personal data processed by Everbridge in its role as an employer or prospective employer. If you are an Everbridge employee or candidate for employment and would like to review the notices applicable in these circumstances, please email privacy@everbridge.com.
1.   Personal Data We Process
The personal data we process may include:
Device Information:
When you access or use our Platform (including our mobile applications), interact with our digital advertisements, or open our emails, we may learn information about your browser or device (e.g., name or type, version, settings, etc.), IP address, unique online identifiers (e.g., MAC address, mobile device identifiers, etc.), internet service provider or mobile network information, the name and version of your operating system, referring and exit pages, and the date and time of your visit.
Usage Data:
We process information about your interactions with our Platform (including interactions with our mobile applications), digital advertisements, and emails, including the pages you visit and how often and for how long you use the Platform, links or buttons you click, the search terms you enter, performance data, recordings or event logging of your sessions, and other similar interactions with our Platform, emails, or digital advertisements.
Non-Precise Location Data:
When you access or use our Platform (including our mobile applications), interact with our digital advertisements, or open our emails, we may learn your non- precise geographic location, including by collecting your IP address or other Device Information.
Please note that, in connection with certain Services (e.g., our travel risk management services and our Nixle Services), and where you have expressly enabled a relevant feature within your mobile device’s settings, we may process Precise Location Data (for more information, see below under “Sensitive Data”).
Contact Information:
We may process your contact information, including identifiers such as your first and last name, postal address, telephone number, and email address.
Professional and Employment Information:
We may process information about your employment, including your employer’s name and your title, professional credentials, institutional affiliations, and business contact information.
Demographic Information:
We may process demographic details about you such as your birthdate or age, gender, social media information and profile data, and similar demographic details.
Preferences:
We may process information about your preferences, including with respect to how you prefer to communicate with us, and whether you’d like to subscribe to our newsletter and marketing communications.
Payment Card Information, Payment Details, and Purchasing History:
Our third-party service providers process your payment card information and other payment details if you purchase our Services. We may also process information about other products or services you’ve purchased or considered purchasing.
Call Records, Email Records, and Chat Logs:
If you call, text, email, submit questions or comments via our “Contact Us” web form, or use the “chatbot” feature of our Platform to contact our sales or support service representatives (or other agents or representatives of Everbridge), or reach out to us via a social media platform, or contact us via other forms of inbound communication, we may keep records of those conversations including any information you have provided to us in connection with such conversation.
Submitted Content:
We process any personal data submitted to us via the Platform, email, or postal mail, including any personal data provided in open text fields, in your written feedback, product reviews and testimonials, responses to surveys, or other information, photos, or videos. “Submitted Content” also includes personal data that you share with us through your mobile device’s settings, such as when you allow our mobile applications to access photos, files, or documents on your device, or create audio or video recordings (e.g., when you use our mobile application to record what is happening around you when you feel unsafe).
Account Credentials:
If you register an account with Everbridge, we process your account credentials, including your account log-in name and password. Please note that in some cases, your employer may register an account on your behalf (e.g., when a customer administrator sets up user accounts).
Inferences:
We may draw inferences about any of the information in this Section 1 that may relate to your preferences, characteristics, or other matters.
Travel-Related Data:
If you are a user of our travel risk management services, or similar travel- related services, we may process details about your travel plans, including your travel itinerary, accommodation reservations, usual place of work while traveling, and information about your international travel history.
Sensitive Data:
Certain Services (e.g., our travel risk management services and our Nixle Services) may require us to process personal data that may be considered “sensitive data,” or “special category” data, as those terms (or similar terms) are defined under applicable data protection laws, including:
Medical or health data (e.g., allergies, injuries, medications, vaccinations, physical, mental, and dental health histories, pregnancy status, etc.), and health insurance data;
Passport or other government-issued identification number;
race or ethnicity;
nationality or immigration status; and
precise geolocation data (i.e., your precise latitudinal and longitudinal coordinates) (“
Precise Location Data
”), which may be supplemented by “motion data” collected from your mobile device (our use of “motion data” improves our ability to determine your precise geolocation while using less of your device’s battery).
Children’s Data:
If you are a user of our travel risk management services and you plan to travel with your children, we may process information, that you provide us with, about your children, including your children’s names, ages, descriptions, and any plans for schooling and childcare while traveling. We may also process information, that you provide us with, about your children that may constitute “Sensitive Data” as set out above.
Everbridge may anonymize or aggregate certain of the above categories of information so that it is no longer linked or reasonably linkable to you, at which time it is no longer “personal data.” We will not reidentify or attempt to reidentify such information unless we are required by law to do so.
2.  How We Collect Your Personal Data
We may collect the information described above from various sources, including directly from you, from an Everbridge business client with which you have a relationship (e.g., employer-employee), from third parties we partner with, and through cookies or other automated means.
Directly from You:
We collect information directly from you when you provide it to us, including when you contact us via email, phone, text message, postal mail, or on our social media pages, through our chatbot, or communicate with our employees and agents in person; upload Submitted Content to our Platform (including through web forms) or submit it via email, postal mail, or social media); create an Everbridge account; respond to a survey or questionnaire or provide a testimonial; or select or update your communication preferences.
Automatically from Your Device or Browser:
Certain information (e.g., Device Information, Usage Data, Non-Precise Location Data, and (if you choose to enable it) Precise Location Data) is automatically collected from your device or browser when you visit our Platform, open our emails, or interact with our digital advertisements.s.
From Third Parties:
Certain third parties may share information with us that they have collected from or about you, including, for example, data analytics companies, advertising and marketing companies, data brokers, business partners, event and conference organizers, or service providers and vendors that assist with the operation and functionality of our Platform and our business more generally.
If you are a user of a Service as a result of your relationship with a particular Everbridge business client (e.g., employer-employee), we may receive information about you from such business client, and likewise, if you are a family member of an individual who has a relationship with a particular Everbridge client, then we may collect information about you from your family member or the relevant business client.
Using Cookies and Similar Technologies:
Everbridge uses cookies (small files stored on your device or browser), pixel tags (tiny graphic images embedded in a website, app, or email), and similar technologies to automatically collect information when you visit our Platform or interact with our emails or digital advertisements, including, for example, Device Information, Usage Data, Non-Precise Location Data, and Precise Location Data. Through the use of cookies and similar technologies, we may link information about your interactions with our Platform, emails, or digital advertisements over time, for example, which pages you visit, which links or buttons you click, and how long you stay on each page.
We also partner with third-party advertising, marketing, session recording, and data analytics companies (including certain social media advertising partners) that use cookies or similar technologies to collect and/or record information about your interactions with our Platform, emails, and digital advertisements, and your interactions with other websites and digital platforms, and that use and share the information gathered to deliver ads more tailored to your interests. We receive information from these third parties to understand our advertising effectiveness, to provide our Services, and to understand the operation, functionality, and use of the Platform. We may not control personal information once collected by such third parties. The collection and use of your information by one of our website analytics providers, Google Analytics, is governed by Google’s privacy policy, which can be found
here.
Publicly Available Sources:
We may collect information from publicly available sources, such as social media and professional networking sites, and profile pages available on company websites.
3.   How We Use Your Personal Data
How we use the personal data we collect depends on how you interact with us and may include the business or commercial purposes listed below. Where we make reference to the legal bases for processing your personal data, such bases apply only to the extent applicable data protection law requires us to have a lawful basis for such processing and where we are acting to determine the purpose and means of such data processing. Where we process information on behalf of our customers, you should contact them to learn more about their practices.
Performance of Our Services:
We and our service providers will process your personal data for the purposes of performing our Services, including (i) to fulfill your purchase orders (e.g., to process payments, to confirm or update you on the status of your order, etc.); (ii) when you create an Everbridge account, register as a user (as an employee or employer) of our travel risk management, crisis management, business continuity, or contract tracing services, sign up to receive notifications of emergencies, submit an anonymous tip or other messages using our Nixle Service, or seek technical or other support services; (iii) to assess and troubleshoot issues that arise in connection with the use of the Platform and other Services; and (iv) to provide you with access to white papers, webinars, and similar resources.
If you have a relationship with a particular Everbridge business client, or you are a family member of such an individual, we will process your personal data as permitted by our contract with that business client.
We rely on several legal bases for the processing of your personal data for the purpose of providing our Services, as follows:
Performance of a contract
: When processing Account Credentials; Contact Information; Professional and Employment Information; Demographic Information; Payment Card Information, Payment Details and Purchasing History; Travel-Related Data; Sensitive Data; and Children’s Data.
Consent
: When processing Device Information, Usage Data and Precise Location Data collected via non-essential cookies (where such consent is required by applicable law); and, in certain circumstances, when processing Sensitive Data.
Vital interests
: Where it is in your or another person’s vital interests to process the personal data we maintain in connection with our Services.
Legal obligation
: Where we are required to process personal data in order to meet our legal obligations, such as for accounting purposes or the prevention of fraud.
Everbridge’s legitimate interests
: When processing Submitted Content; when drawing Inferences from the personal data you provide. You may have the right object to our processing of your personal data on the basis of Everbridge’s legitimate interests; to do so, please see the section titled
“Your Privacy Rights and Choices”
below.
Where required by law we will process “special category” data only with your explicit consent.
Communications:
We will process your personal data contained in Call Records, Email Records and Chat Logs in order to communicate with you, including when we respond to your requests and inquiries and when we ask for feedback through surveys, product reviews and testimonials, or other messages.
We rely on the following legal bases for the processing of your personal data for communication purposes:
Performance of a contract:
Where you have made a request or inquiry.
Everbridge’s legitimate interests: Where we ask for feedback. You may have the right object to our processing of your personal data on the basis of Everbridge’s legitimate interests; to do so, please see the section titled
“Your Privacy Rights and Choices”
below.
Advertising and Marketing:
We may process your personal data for purposes of advertising and marketing our Services online and via email, direct mail, and telephone, and using other communication channels, including social media platforms and internet search engines.
Additionally, if you choose to communicate or provide feedback, reviews, or testimonials, we may use such information for advertising and marketing purposes and to help us improve our products and Services.
Everbridge participates in targeted advertising (also referred to as “cross-context behavioral advertising”), meaning we use third-party advertising companies to display digital ads tailored to your individual interests based on your online activities, as well as to provide advertising-related services such as ad delivery, reporting, attribution, analytics, and market research. We allow third- party companies to collect and process certain information when you visit our Platform and, to the extent required by applicable law, with your consent to our use of non-essential cookies. This information may be used to serve digital ads for Everbridge Services and for the products or services of other companies.
Additionally, if you choose to communicate or provide feedback, reviews, or testimonials, we may use such information for advertising and marketing purposes and to help us improve our products and Services.We rely on the following legal bases for the processing of your personal data for advertising and marketing purposes:
We rely on the following legal bases for the processing of your personal data for advertising and marketing purposes:
Everbridge’s legitimate interests
: Where permitted by applicable law, we may process your personal data in order to contact you for our marketing and advertising purposes because it is in our legitimate interests to promote our Services we think you might be interested in. You may have the right object to our processing of your personal data on the basis of Everbridge’s legitimate interests; to do so, please see the section titled “
Your Privacy
Rights and Choices”
below.
Consent
: Where required by applicable law, we will process your personal data in order to contact you for our marketing and advertising purposes only after you have consented to receive our marketing communications. With your consent, we may also include your name alongside any testimonial you provide.
You can opt-out of (or withdraw your consent to) receiving our marketing communications, or ask us to remove your testimonial from the Platform or our marketing materials, at any time as set forth in the paragraph titled “Additional Privacy Choices” below.
Understanding Our Business Clients and Users and Maintaining and Improving Our
Services:
We may process your personal data in order to analyze your use of our Services and our Services’ performance. For example, we may process the personal data we collect when you interact with our Platform in order to maintain and improve the Platform and to develop new features or services. Likewise, we may keep track of the pages you visit and the manner in which you use the Platform and other Services, including by utilizing third parties to provide ‘heat maps’ and session recording, in order to determine whether to make changes to our Platform or other Services. We may also send you surveys or seek your feedback in other ways. We may, from time to time, aggregate your information and information of other users to help us analyze trends and purchasing patterns and preferences.
We rely on Everbridge’s legitimate interests as the legal basis for the processing of personal data for purposes of understanding our business clients and users; maintaining, changing, and improving our Services; and developing new features and services. You may have the right object to our processing of your personal data on the basis of Everbridge’s legitimate interests; to do so, please see the section titled
“Your Privacy Rights and Choices”
below.
Personalization:
We may process your personal data in order to record your preferences and personalize your experience on our Platform (e.g., language settings, marketing communications preferences, etc.).
We rely on Everbridge’s legitimate interests and legal obligations as the legal bases for processing your personal data for security and fraud-prevention purposes. You may have the right object to our processing of your personal data on the basis of Everbridge’s legitimate interests; to do so, please see the section titled
“Your Privacy Rights and Choices”
below.
Security and Fraud Prevention:
We will process your personal data as needed to protect Everbridge, our employees, our business clients and partners, and our users from fraud, security threats, and other illegal or harmful activity.
We rely on Everbridge’s legitimate interests and legal obligations as the legal bases for processing your personal data for security and fraud-prevention purposes. You may have the right object to our processing of your personal data on the basis of Everbridge’s legitimate interests; to do so, please see the section titled
“Your Privacy Right
s and Choices”
below.
Legal Obligations:
We will process your personal data as needed to comply with legal and regulatory requirements and to respond to requests from courts or other governmental or regulatory authorities.
4.  How We Share Personal Data with Third Parties
We may share information with third parties for certain business or commercial purposes. For example:
Service Providers and Business Partners:
We partner with third-party service providers and business partners to assist with many aspects of our business, including fulfilling purchasing orders, payment processing, analyzing our users’ interests and activities, distributing and processing surveys, providing telecommunication services, providing certain functionalities on our Platform (e.g., our chatbot), helping us communicate with our business clients and users, and operating our business more generally.
Business Clients:
If you have a relationship with a particular Everbridge business client (e.g., your employer purchases Everbridge Services on behalf of its employees), or you are a family member of such an individual, we may share your personal data as required by our contract with that business client.
Advertising and Marketing Partners:
We partner with third parties to facilitate the advertising and marketing of our business, including, for example, advertising and marketing companies, digital advertising networks, data brokers, data analytics providers, social media companies, and business partners.
Affiliates or Successors:
We may disclose certain personal data to our affiliates and subsidiaries for their use. Your personal data may also be transferred to another entity that succeeds, or intends to succeed, to all or part of our business in connection with a sale, reorganization, consolidation, or merger.
Other Third Parties:
We will disclose information about you to third parties, including to government bodies or law enforcement agencies, when we believe it to be necessary for compliance with the law or to protect Everbridge, our clients and users, our employees, or the public more generally. For example we may disclose specific personal data if we reasonably believe it is necessary to: (i) investigate any suspected fraud or misuse of the Platform or Services; (ii) protect or defend the rights, property, or interests of Everbridge, our employees, our clients and users, or the rights, property, or interests of our business partners or service providers; or (iii) protect the personal safety of our employees, clients and users, or the public.
At Your Direction or Request, or to Protect Your Vital Interests:
We will disclose information about you to other third parties at your direction or with your consent, or as needed to protect your, or another person’s, vital interests. For example, certain of our Services may include the sharing of your name and contact information with transport providers, medical facilities, and immigration offices. Unless in an emergency (for example where we need to provide information immediately to a medical facility), when we rely on vital interests as the legal basis for such sharing, we will act on your instructions or ask for your consent before sharing your information.
In some cases, third parties may retain rights to process information for their own purposes, and/or subject to their own privacy notices.
Because Everbridge is a global company, the above disclosures of personal data to third parties may involve the cross-border transfer of such personal data, including – with respect to the personal data of EEA or UK residents – transfers to a third country. We may, for example, transfer the personal data of UK, EEA, Australian, or Brazilian residents to third parties located in the United States, and vice versa. For information regarding such international data transfers, including the legal mechanisms for such transfers, please see the section titled
“International Data Transfers”
below.
5.  Your Privacy Rights and Choices
Certain states’ and countries’ data protection laws (including, for example, the data protection laws of the UK, EU, Brazil, and Australia) provide their residents with rights regarding businesses’ use of their personal data (sometimes referred to as “personal information”). Regardless of your state or country of residence, you may contact Everbridge using the instructions set out below to request that we:
confirm whether we’re processing your personal data;
provide you with access to your personal data or a copy of your personal data in a commonly used electronic format (or provide it in that format to a third party at your direction);
request information about third parties with whom your personal data has been shared;
change, update, or correct your personal data;
delete, block, or anonymize some or all of your personal data;
restrict our processing of your personal data; or
opt out of our sale of your personal data or our sharing of your personal data for purposes of targeted advertising (or “cross-context behavioral advertising”).
Where our processing of your personal data is on the basis of our legitimate interest, you may also contact us to object to our processing of your personal data, and, where our processing of your personal data is on the basis of your consent, you may (i) request information regarding your decision to refuse such consent and the consequences of such refusal; (ii) withdraw your consent to such processing; and (iii) request that we delete your personal data after withdrawing your consent.
If you are a California resident, please see the section titled
“California Privacy Rights”
below.
Although the above rights are not always available to every person, we will consider and respond to your requests promptly, and otherwise in accordance with all applicable laws. Furthermore, if you choose to exercise your privacy rights or make the above requests, Everbridge will not treat you in a discriminatory way, nor will you receive a lesser degree of service from Everbridge.
Instructions for submitting requests.
You can make any of the above requests by either visiting our Data Subject Request Page available here
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-individual-
rights-request-form-and-access-procedures/,
or by emailing us at
dsar.request@everbridge.com
and clearly stating the request(s) you would like to make.
In order to help ensure that your personal data is not disclosed to any person who does not have the right to receive it, and to help ensure your personal data is not mistakenly deleted or changed, we will attempt to verify that you are the subject of the personal data you are requesting to access, delete, or correct. We may ask for your email address and about your relationship to Everbridge (e.g., Platform user, client employee, etc.). We will compare the information you provide to any information we may have in our possession in order to verify your identity. We may also contact you at the email address you’ve provided to request additional information in relation to your request. Everbridge will use the information collected through the request process only for verification purposes and responding to your request.
We will confirm receipt of your request within 10 business days. If you do not receive confirmation within the 10-day timeframe, please email us at
dsar.request@everbridge.com.
We endeavor to substantively respond to a verifiable request within 30 days of its receipt. If we require more time (up to another 30 days), we will contact you at the email address you provide.
Authorized Agent.
You may also choose to authorize an agent to make the above requests or exercise your rights. If you use an agent, as permitted by law, we will take measures to verify your agent’s authorization to act on your behalf and we may require more information to ensure proper verification of both you and your agent’s identity and authorization.
Please note that Everbridge may not be able to respond to your request if we cannot verify your identity, or your agent’s identity and authority to make the request, and confirm the personal data relates to you.
Appeals Procedure.
You may appeal our decision to decline your request by emailing us at
dsar.request@everbridge.com
using subject line “DSAR Appeal” and clearly stating the decision(s) you wish to appeal. We will respond to your appeal within 45 days of our receipt of your email, which response will include an explanation of our decision. If you are dissatisfied with our decision on appeal, and you live in any of the following U.S. states, you may contact the regulatory authority listed for that state:
Virginia: The Virginia Attorney General can be contacted
here.
Connecticut: The Connecticut Attorney General can be contacted
here
.
Colorado: The Colorado Attorney General can be contacted
here.
If you live in another U.S. state, you can use the website located
here
to help you find your state’s attorney general’s contact information.
Residents of the UK/EEA
. You may also have the right to lodge a complaint with us, the supervisory authority for data protection issues in the United Kingdom (the Information Commissioner’s Office), or, if you are based in the EU, your member state’s supervisory authority, which you can find
here.
Residents of Brazil
. You may also have the right to lodge a formal complaint with us using the contact information listed in the “Contact Us” section of this Privacy Notice. If we if we fail to resolve your issue within a reasonable period of time, you may petition the Brazilian Data Protection Authority (ANPD) via the ANPD’s website, https://
www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br.
Residents of Australia
. You may also have the right to lodge a formal complaint with us using the contact information listed in the “Contact Us” section of this Privacy Notice. If we have not responded to you within a reasonable period of time, you are entitled under the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) to make a complaint to the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner (OAIC). You may contact the OAIC via the OAIC’s website,
www.oaic.gov.au,
or by phone at 1300 363 992.
Residents of Countries Not Listed Above
. If you are a resident of a country that is not listed above, you may also have the right under your country’s data protection law to lodge a formal complaint with us using the contact information listed in the “Contact Us” section of this Privacy Notice, or by contacting your country’s data protection authority.
Additional Privacy Choices:
Emails:
You can unsubscribe from our marketing emails by clicking the unsubscribe link in the footer of such email, or by emailing us at
privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com
or calling us at +1- 781-373-9800.
Telephone Marketing:
You can withdraw your consent to receive our marketing telephone calls by emailing us at privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com or calling us at +1-781-373-9800.
Direct Mail:
You can request that we remove you from our direct mail mailing list by emailing us at
privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com
or calling us at +1-781-373-9800.
Cookies and Similar Technologies:
You may opt out of certain third-party cookies by following your device or browser’s instructions or by using the opt-out tools provided by the following industry groups:
Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA):
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
Network Advertising Initiative (NAI):
http://optout.networkadvertising.org
Please note that cookie opt-outs are device and browser-specific. You may still see targeted advertising from us when using a different device or browser unless you also opt-out using that device or browser.
Furthermore, if you opt out of our cookies, you may experience some inconvenience in your use of the Platform.
Mobile Application Access to Content and Precise Geolocation Data
: If you have consented to our processing of Submitted Content that you’ve provided to us by adjusting the settings in our mobile applications (e.g., to upload photos or documents, or to create video or audio recordings), you can change these permissions (and stop permitting us to access such data) within the settings of our mobile applications at any time. Likewise, you can change the settings in our mobile applications to stop sharing your Precise Location Data and/or “motion data” (which we use to assist us in determining your precise geolocation) with us at any time.
Text Messages
: If you have elected to receive text messages in connection with a Service, you can change your preferences or unsubscribe from such text messages by adjusting your settings within your Service profile or account; replying to an Everbridge text with the word STOP; emailing us at privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com; or calling us at +1-781-373-9800. Please note that we do not utilize contact details provided by users or enterprise customers pursuant to our Services for any marketing or other non-Services related outreach. Mobile opt-in data will not be shared with third parties other than for the purposes of the service.
Testimonials
. When you provide a testimonial, we may include your testimonial on our Platform or in our marketing materials. With your consent, we may include your name alongside the testimonial. You can ask us to removal your testimonial at any time by contacting us at marketing@everbridge.com.
6.  Chatbots
Everbridge has integrated chatbot capabilities into its websites that aims to help users ask general questions and request information about our Services. Your interactions with a chatbot are voluntary. You alone decide whether or not to interact with the chatbot, and what information you disclose to us about yourself when you choose to interact with the chatbot. YOUR CONVERSATIONS WITH OUR CHATBOT MAY BE RECORDED BY OR ON BEHALF OF EVERBRIDGE. Everbridge will use the information you disclose to us via the chatbot, as well as any associated metadata, (i) to respond to your requests and queries, (ii) to analyze, evaluate and improve our products and services, and (iii) for purposes marketing and advertising our Services. We may disclose this information (including the recording of your conversation with the chatbot) as described in the section of this Privacy Notice titled “How We Share Personal Data with Third Parties,” including to the service provider that provides the chatbot functionality. We will retain information collected through the chatbot and the associated metadata for the period set forth in the section titled “Retention” below.
7.  Children
We do not knowingly or purposefully request or collect personal data from children, except as required to provide our Services to such child’s parent or guardian, or to the employer of such child’s parent or guardian. If you believe that such personal data was provided to Everbridge without applicable consent, please contact us at
privacy@everbridge.com.
8.  Security
The security of your personal data and our business clients’ information is important to us. We have implemented safeguards designed to reasonably secure your personal data from accidental loss and from unauthorized access, use, alteration, and disclosure. Unfortunately, we cannot guarantee the security of information provided over the Internet or stored in our databases. Your transmissions are, therefore, at your own risk. You can help protect your information by: being selective about not including sensitive information unnecessarily, selecting strong, unique passwords for your Everbridge account and any associated email addresses, and using security features like single-sign on and multi-factor authentication.
9.  Retention
We retain personal data for so long as reasonably necessary for the purpose for which it was collected (for example, to provide you with Services you have requested), unless we are required by law to dispose of it earlier or to keep it longer. We also retain personal data as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, pursue legitimate business interests, conduct audits, and protect or enforce our rights.
10. International Data Transfers
The personal data that we process may be transferred to and/or stored within our servers or our third-party servers in a country that is different from the country where it was collected. We may, for example, transfer the personal data of UK, EEA, Australian, or Brazilian residents to Everbridge’s, or our service providers’ or partners’, servers located in the United States, and vice versa. Personal data may also be processed by staff who work for us or for one of our service providers or partners in a country different from the country where the data was collected. Certain data protection laws require data controllers to put in place safeguards to protect personal data transferred across borders. For more information about Everbridge’s compliance with data protection laws governing cross-border transfers of personal data from the UK and EU, please review the page of our Privacy and Data Protection Portal titled “Compliance with UK and EU Transfer Requirements” available here
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-transfer-requirements-paper.
EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks
Everbridge, Inc. and certain of its U.S. affiliates participate in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework. Additional information about Everbridge’s participation in these Frameworks is available here
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-
data-protection-framework-2/.
11.  Website Terms of Use
Everbridges’ and its subsidiaries’ and affiliates websites Terms of Use are located here
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-terms-of-use.
12.  Links to Other Platforms; Social Media Platforms
Our Platform may, from time to time, contain links to websites owned and operated by third parties (“Third- Party Platforms”). We encourage you to review the privacy policies of such Third-Party Platforms so that you understand how those websites collect, use, and share your information. We are not responsible for the privacy policies or other content on Third-Party Platforms.
If you engage or communicate with Everbridge on a social media platform (e.g., LinkedIn, Facebook, Twitter, etc.), we may contact you via direct message or use other social media tools to interact with you. In these instances, your communications and interactions with us are governed by this Privacy Notice as well as the privacy notice of the social media platform you use.
13. Contact Us
We welcome your comments and questions. Please contact us by email at
privacy@everbridge.com,
by phone at +1-781-373-9800, or by mail at the following address:
Everbridge, Inc.
Attn: Privacy Officer
8300 Boone BLVD, Suite 800
Vienna, Virginia
14.  California Privacy Rights
This section contains additional disclosures required by the California Consumer Privacy Act (as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act, and as may be further amended from time to time, and together with all implementing regulations, the “CCPA”).
Personal Information We Collect
. In the preceding 12 months, we may have collected the categories of personal information about California consumers set out in the section of this Privacy Notice titled “Personal Data We Process” above, for the business and commercial purposes described in the section titled “How We Use Your Personal Data” above.
Categories of Sources
. We collected the above-mentioned personal information from the sources described in the section of this Privacy Notice titled “How We Collect Your Personal Data” above.
Personal Information Disclosed for Business Purposes
. We may have disclosed the above-mentioned personal information to the third parties listed in the section of this Privacy Notice titled “How We Share Personal Data with Third Parties” for the purposes set out in that section and the section titled “How We Use Your Personal Data” above.
Personal Information “Sold” or “Shared”
. We may share certain categories of personal information with third parties for marketing and advertising purposes, which may constitute “selling” or “sharing,” as those terms are defined in the CCPA. Such “sale” or “sharing” does not include information about individuals we know are under the age of 16.
In the preceding twelve (12) months, Everbridge may have “sold” or “shared” the categories of personal information listed below with the categories of third parties listed below. For instructions to opt out of this sale or sharing, please see the section titled “
Your Privacy Rights and Choices”
above.
Categories of Personal Information:
Device Information
Usage Data
Non-Precise Location Data
Contact Information
Professional and Employment Information
Demographic Information
Inferences
Other information about you that is linked to the personal information above.
“Shared” with or “sold” to the following categories of third parties
:
Advertising/marketing companies
Advertising networks
Data brokers
Data analytics providers
Social media companies
Business partners
Sensitive Personal Information
. Everbridge may collect and process categories of sensitive personal information as necessary for the provision of our Services. We do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for purposes other than those set out in Cal. Reg. tit. 11 § 7027(m).
An Explanation of Your Rights
. The CCPA provides California residents with specific rights regarding their personal information. Please see the section of this Privacy Notice titled
“Your Privacy Rights and Choices”
above for an explanation of your rights and how you may exercise them. In addition to the rights set forth in that section, California residents may contact us at any time to request that we disclose additional details regarding their personal information, including the categories of personal information, the categories of sources from which the personal information was collected, the business or commercial purposes for the collection, selling, or sharing your personal information, the categories of third parties to whom we have disclosed personal information; and the specific pieces of personal information we have collected about you. The instructions for requesting that we disclose this information are set forth in the section of this Privacy Notice titled
“Your Privacy Rights and Choices”
above.
15.  Residents of Nevada
If you are a Nevada consumer, you have the right to request that a company not sell your personal data for monetary consideration to certain other parties. This right applies even if your personal data is not currently being sold. If you wish to exercise this right, you can submit a request by emailing us at
privacy@everbridge.com
or writing us at: Everbridge, Inc., 25 Corporate Drive, Suite 400, Burlington, MA 01803, Attn: Privacy Officer.
16.  Residents of the UK and EEA – Article 14 Privacy Notice
Everbridge may, from time to time, obtain personal data from a source other than from the data subject directly (or from a data processor or business partner that has obtained it from the data subject directly on Everbridge’s behalf), including, for example, from event or conference coordinators, lead-generation service providers, and trusted business partners with whom Everbridge engages in cross-marketing opportunities. In these circumstances, Everbridge may obtain your contact information, including your name, title, employer’s name.
“How We Share Personal Data with Third Parties,” and
“Your Privacy Rights and Choices”
apply to the personal data we obtain in the circumstances set out in this section.
Pont d’Everbridge Avis de confidentialité mondial
DERNIÈRE MISE À JOUR : 14 Novembre 2024
VEUILLEZ LIRE ATTENTIVEMENT CET AVIS DE CONFIDENTIALITÉ
Le présent Avis de confidentialité décrit la manière dont Everbridge, Inc. (ainsi que ses filiales et sociétés affiliées, « Everbridge », « nous », « notre » et « nos ») collecte, traite et partage vos données personnelles, ainsi que les droits et les choix qui s’offrent à vous en ce qui concerne vos données personnelles.
Nous pouvons réviser périodiquement le présent Avis de confidentialité et, dans ce cas, nous réviserons la date figurant en haut du présent Avis de confidentialité en conséquence. Les modifications apportées au présent Avis de confidentialité entrent en vigueur au moment de leur publication, et nous vous encourageons donc à consulter le présent Avis de confidentialité de temps à autre. En outre, le présent Avis de confidentialité peut être complété ou modifié de temps à autre par d’autres avis publiés ailleurs, y compris sur des pages spécifiques de notre Plateforme et lorsque vous utilisez certains Services.
Cet avis de confidentialité est disponible ici : https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-global-privacy-notice.
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-global-privacy-notice
.
Applicabilité de la présente Politique de confidentialité à nos services. Le présent Avis de confidentialité s’applique aux données à caractère personnel qu’Everbridge. Cela inclut les données personnelles que nous recueillons lorsque vous interagissez avec nous dans certains contextes en ligne, par exemple, lorsque vous accédez ou utilisez nos sites Web (y compris, mais sans s’y limiter, www.everbridge.com, manager.everbridge.net, www.xmatters.com, flight-safe.com, www.bestinresilience.com, www.redskye911.com
www.nixle.com
, and www.infiniteblue.com), les sites mobiles, les applications mobiles et basées sur un navigateur, les plateformes et certains produits Everbridge (y compris Everbridge Travel Protector, Everbridge Assist, Anvil Riskmatics, Infinite Blue et Everbridge Business Continuity in the Cloud),  dans chaque cas qui renvoient à la présente Politique de confidentialité (l’ensemble de ce qui précède est collectivement désigné ci-après sous le nom de « Plateforme »), ou lorsque vous communiquez avec nous par e-mail, SMS ou interagissez avec nos publicités numériques.
https://www.everbridge.com/
http://manager.everbridge.net/
Cela inclut également les données personnelles que nous collectons lorsque vous interagissez avec nous dans certains contextes hors ligne, par exemple, lorsque vous nous voyez lors de conférences ou de salons professionnels, ou lorsque vous communiquez avec nos équipes de vente ou de service d’assistance en personne, par téléphone ou par courrier postal. Dans le présent concernant l’Avis de confidentialité, nous désignons les produits et services que nous, à la fois en ligne (y compris via la Plateforme) et hors ligne, en tant que « Services ».
Le présent Avis de confidentialité ne s’applique pas lorsqu’Everbridge agit en tant que prestataire de services auprès de nos clients professionnels (parfois appelé « sous-traitant » ou « responsable du traitement des données »), auquel cas le client professionnel d’Everbridge est le responsable du traitement des données, et nous traitons vos données personnelles conformément à l’accord que nous avons conclu avec ce client professionnel. Si vous êtes un client d’un client Everbridge et avez des questions sur la politique de confidentialité  et le traitement de vos données personnelles par Everbridge au nom de ce client, veuillez contacter directement ce client ou vous réferez à leur politique de confidentialité.
Avis sur les pratiques en matière de protection de la vie privée pour les renseignements médicaux. Veuillez noter que certains services d’Everbridge peuvent impliquer la fourniture de services de soins de santé et le traitement de vos informations médicales. L’utilisation et la divulgation de vos informations médicales dans ce contexte, ainsi que vos droits à l’égard de ces informations médicales, sont décrits dans l’Avis de pratiques de confidentialité d’Everbridge pour les informations médicales, qui est disponible ici,
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-privacy-practices-for-medical
.
Avis sur les pratiques en matière de protection de la vie privée pour les renseignements médicaux. Veuillez noter que certains services d’Everbridge peuvent impliquer la fourniture de services de soins de santé et le traitement de vos informations médicales. L’utilisation et la divulgation de vos informations médicales dans ce contexte, ainsi que vos droits à l’égard de ces informations médicales, sont décrits dans l’Avis de pratiques de confidentialité d’Everbridge pour les informations médicales, qui est disponible ici, https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-privacy-practices-for-medical.
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-privacy-practices-for-medical
Pratiques spécifiques aux services Nixle en matière de données : Les conditions et limitations supplémentaires suivantes s’appliquent à la manière dont Everbridge collecte et traite les données personnelles lorsque vous interagissez ou utilisez les services Everbridge Nixle, qui peuvent être disponibles via des sites mobiles, des applications mobiles et basées sur un navigateur, des intégrations de sites Web, des widgets, des messages et d’autres plateformes (collectivement, le « service Nixle ») (« données personnelles Nixle »). Nous, nos prestataires de services, [et nos partenaires commerciaux], traitons uniquement les données personnelles Nixle à des fins d’exécution du service Nixle, des communications (y compris la réponse aux informations anonymes et autres messages soumis au service Nixle), de l’amélioration du service Nixle, de la personnalisation, de la sécurité et de la prévention de la fraude, et selon les besoins pour se conformer aux obligations légales (chacune étant décrite plus en détail dans leurs sections respectives « Comment nous utilisons vos données personnelles » de l’avis de confidentialité ci-dessous). Everbridge ne :
vend pas les données personnelles Nixle ; ou
partage pas les données personnelles Nixle avec des tiers pour leur propre usage indépendant ou à des fins publicitaires
1.   Données personnelles que nous traitons
Les données à caractère personnel que nous traitons peuvent inclure :
Informations sur l’appareil
: Lorsque vous accédez ou utilisez notre Plateforme (y compris nos applications mobiles), interagissez avec nos publicités numériques ou ouvrez nos e-mails, nous pouvons obtenir des informations sur votre navigateur ou votre appareil (par exemple, nom ou type, version, paramètres, etc.), votre adresse IP, vos identifiants uniques en ligne (par exemple, adresse MAC, identifiants d’appareil mobile, etc.), votre fournisseur d’accès Internet ou des informations sur votre réseau mobile, le nom et la version de votre système d’exploitation,  pages de renvoi et de sortie, ainsi que la date et l’heure de votre visite.
Données d’utilisation
: Nous traitons des informations sur vos interactions avec notre Plateforme (y compris les interactions avec nos applications mobiles), les publicités numériques et les e-mails, y compris les pages que vous visitez et la fréquence et la durée de votre utilisation de la Plateforme, les liens ou boutons sur lesquels vous cliquez, les termes de recherche que vous saisissez, les données de performance et d’autres interactions similaires avec notre Plateforme, les e-mails ou les publicités numériques.
Données de localisation non précises
: Lorsque vous accédez à notre Plateforme (y compris nos applications mobiles) ou que vous l’utilisez, que vous interagissez avec nos publicités numériques ou que vous ouvrez nos e-mails, nous pouvons connaître votre emplacement géographique non précis, notamment en collectant votre adresse IP ou d’autres Informations sur votre appareil. Veuillez noter que, dans le cadre de certains Services (par exemple, nos services de gestion des risques liés aux voyages), et lorsque vous avez expressément activé une fonctionnalité pertinente dans les paramètres de votre appareil mobile, nous pouvons traiter des données de géolocalisation précises (pour plus d’informations, voir ci-dessous sous « Données sensibles »).
Coordonnées :
Nous pouvons traiter vos coordonnées, y compris des identifiants tels que votre prénom et votre nom, votre adresse postale, votre numéro de téléphone et votre adresse e-mail.
Informations sur la profession et l’emploi :
Nous pouvons traiter des informations sur votre emploi, y compris le nom et le titre de votre employeur, vos qualifications professionnelles, vos affiliations institutionnelles et vos coordonnées professionnelles.
Données démographiques :
Nous pouvons traiter des informations démographiques vous concernant, telles que votre date de naissance ou votre âge, votre sexe, vos informations sur les réseaux sociaux et vos données de profil, ainsi que des informations démographiques similaires.
Préférences :
Nous pouvons traiter des informations sur vos préférences, y compris en ce qui concerne la façon dont vous préférez communiquer avec nous, et si vous souhaitez vous abonner à notre newsletter et à nos communications marketing.
Informations de carte de paiement, détails de paiement et historique d’achat :
Nos fournisseurs de services tiers traitent les informations de votre carte de paiement et d’autres détails de paiement si vous achetez nos Services. Nous pouvons également traiter des informations sur d’autres produits ou services que vous avez achetés ou que vous envisagez d’acheter.
Enregistrements d’appels, enregistrements d’e-mails et journaux de chat :
Si vous appelez, envoyez un SMS, un e-mail, soumettez des questions ou des commentaires via notre formulaire Web « Contactez-nous », ou utilisez la fonction « chatbot » de notre Plateforme pour contacter nos représentants du service commercial ou d’assistance (ou d’autres agents ou représentants d’Everbridge), ou si vous nous contactez via une plateforme de médias sociaux, ou si vous nous contactez via d’autres formes de communication entrante,  Nous pouvons conserver des enregistrements de ces conversations, y compris toute information que vous nous avez fournie dans le cadre de ces conversations.
Contenu soumis :
Nous traitons toutes les données personnelles que vous nous soumettez via la Plateforme, par e-mail ou par courrier postal, y compris toutes les données personnelles partagées dans un champ libre dans vos commentaires écrits, vos avis et témoignages sur les produits, vos réponses à des enquêtes ou d’autres informations, photos ou vidéos. Le « Contenu soumis » comprend également les données personnelles que vous partagez avec nous via les paramètres de votre appareil mobile, par exemple lorsque vous autorisez nos applications mobiles à accéder à des photos, des fichiers ou des documents sur votre appareil, ou à créer des enregistrements audio ou vidéo (par exemple, lorsque vous utilisez notre application mobile pour enregistrer ce qui se passe autour de vous lorsque vous ne vous sentez pas en sécurité).
Informations d’identification du compte :
Si vous créez un compte auprès d’Everbridge, nous traitons les informations d’identification de votre compte, y compris le nom d’utilisateur et le mot de passe de votre compte. Veuillez noter que dans certains cas, votre employeur peut enregistrer un compte en votre nom (par exemple, lorsqu’un administrateur client crée des comptes d’utilisateur).
Inférences :
Nous pouvons tirer des conclusions sur toute information contenue dans la présente section 1 qui peut se rapporter à vos préférences, caractéristiques ou à d’autres questions.
Données relatives aux voyages :
Si vous êtes un utilisateur de nos services de gestion des risques liés aux voyages, ou de services similaires liés aux voyages, nous pouvons traiter des détails sur vos projets de voyage, y compris votre itinéraire de voyage, vos réservations d’hébergement, votre lieu de travail habituel pendant votre voyage et des informations sur votre historique de voyage international.
Données sensibles :
Certains services (par exemple, nos services de gestion des risques liés aux voyages et nos services Nixle) peuvent nous obliger à traiter des données personnelles qui peuvent être considérées comme des « données sensibles » ou des données de « catégorie spéciale », telles que ces termes (ou des termes similaires) sont définis par les lois applicables en matière de protection des données, notamment :
Données médicales ou de santé (par exemple, allergies, blessures, médicaments, vaccinations, antécédents de santé physique, mentale et dentaire, état de grossesse, etc.) et données d’assurance maladie ;
Passeport ou autre numéro d’identification délivré par le government ;
la race ou l’origine ethnique ;
la nationalité ou le statut d’immigration ; et
des données de géolocalisation précises (c’est-à-dire vos coordonnées latitudinales et longitudinales précises), qui peuvent être complétées par des « données de mouvement » collectées à partir de votre appareil mobile (notre utilisation de « données de mouvement » améliore notre capacité à déterminer votre géolocalisation précise tout en utilisant moins de batterie de votre appareil).
Données relatives aux enfants :
Si vous êtes un utilisateur de nos services de gestion des risques liés aux voyages et que vous prévoyez de voyager avec vos enfants, nous pouvons traiter les informations que vous nous fournissez sur vos enfants, y compris les noms, les âges, les descriptions et les plans de scolarité et de garde d’enfants de vos enfants pendant le voyage. Nous pouvons également traiter les informations que vous nous fournissez sur vos enfants qui peuvent constituer des « données sensibles » comme indiqué ci-dessus.
Everbridge peut anonymiser ou agréger certaines des catégories d’informations ci-dessus afin qu’elles ne soient plus liées ou raisonnablement liées à vous, auquel cas il ne s’agit plus de « données personnelles ». Nous ne réidentifierons pas ou ne tenterons pas de réidentifier ces informations, sauf si la loi nous y oblige.
2.  Comment collectons-nous vos données personnelles ?
Nous pouvons recueillir les informations décrites ci-dessus auprès de diverses sources, y compris directement auprès de vous, d’un client professionnel d’Everbridge avec lequel vous entretenez une relation (par exemple, employeur-employé), de tiers avec lesquels nous sommes partenaires, et par le biais de cookies ou d’autres moyens automatisés.
Directement auprès de vous :
Nous recueillons des informations directement auprès de vous lorsque vous nous les fournissez, y compris lorsque vous nous contactez par e-mail, téléphone, SMS, courrier postal ou sur nos pages de médias sociaux, via notre chatbot, ou communiquez avec nos employés et agents en personne ; télécharger le contenu soumis sur notre plateforme (y compris par le biais de formulaires Web) ou le soumettre par e-mail, courrier postal ou médias sociaux) ; créer un compte Everbridge ; répondre à une enquête ou à un questionnaire ou fournir un témoignage ; ou sélectionnez ou mettez à jour vos préférences de communication.
Automatiquement à partir de votre appareil ou de votre navigateur :
Certaines informations (par exemple, les informations sur l’appareil, les données d’utilisation, les données de localisation non précises et (si vous choisissez de les activer) les données de localisation précises) sont automatiquement collectées à partir de votre appareil ou de votre navigateur lorsque vous visitez notre plateforme, ouvrez nos e-mails ou interagissez avec nos publicités numériques.
De la part de tiers :
Certains tiers peuvent partager avec nous les informations qu’ils ont collectées auprès de vous ou à votre sujet, y compris, par exemple, des sociétés d’analyse de données, des sociétés de publicité et de marketing, des courtiers en données, des partenaires commerciaux, des organisateurs d’événements et de conférences, ou des prestataires de services et des fournisseurs qui aident au fonctionnement et à la fonctionnalité de notre Plateforme et de notre entreprise en général.
Si vous êtes un utilisateur d’un Service en raison de votre relation avec un client professionnel particulier d’Everbridge (par exemple, un employeur-employé), nous pouvons recevoir des informations vous concernant de la part de ce client professionnel, et de même, si vous êtes un membre de la famille d’une personne qui a une relation avec un client particulier d’Everbridge, nous pouvons collecter des informations vous concernant auprès du membre de votre famille ou de l’entreprise cliente concernée.
Utilisation de cookies et de technologies similaires :
Everbridge utilise des cookies (petits fichiers stockés sur votre appareil ou votre navigateur), des pixels invisibles (minuscules images graphiques intégrées dans un site Web, une application ou un e-mail) et des technologies similaires pour collecter automatiquement des informations lorsque vous visitez notre Plateforme ou interagissez avec nos e-mails ou publicités numériques, y compris, par exemple, les informations sur l’appareil, les données d’utilisation et les données de localisation précises et non-précises. Grâce à l’utilisation de cookies et de technologies similaires, nous pouvons lier des informations sur vos interactions avec notre Plateforme, des e-mails ou des publicités numériques au fil du temps, par exemple, les pages que vous visitez, les liens ou les boutons sur lesquels vous cliquez et combien de temps vous restez sur chaque page.
Nous travaillons également en partenariat avec des sociétés tierces de publicité, de marketing, d’enregistrements et d’analyse de données (y compris certains partenaires publicitaires sur les réseaux sociaux) qui utilisent des cookies ou des technologies similaires pour collecter et/ou enregistrer des informations sur vos interactions avec notre Plateforme, nos e-mails et nos publicités numériques, ainsi que vos interactions avec d’autres sites Web et plateformes numériques, et qui utilisent et partagent les informations recueillies pour diffuser des publicités plus adaptées à vos intérêts. Nous recevons des informations de ces tiers pour comprendre l’efficacité de notre publicité, exécuter nos services et pour comprendre le fonctionnement, la fonctionnalité et l’utilisation de la Plateforme. La collecte et l’utilisation de vos informations par l’un de nos fournisseurs d’analyse de sites Web, Google Analytics, sont régies par la politique de confidentialité de Google, qui peut être consultée ici.
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Sources accessibles au public :
Nous pouvons recueillir des informations à partir de sources accessibles au public, telles que les médias sociaux et les sites de réseautage professionnel, ainsi que les pages de profil disponibles sur les sites Web des enterprises.
Nous ne répondons pas aux signaux « ne pas suivre » ou à d’autres mécanismes qui offrent aux consommateurs la possibilité d’exercer un choix concernant la collecte d’informations personnelles sur les activités en ligne d’un consommateur individuel et sur des sites Web ou des services en ligne.
3.   Comment utilisons-nous vos données personnelles ?
La manière dont nous utilisons les données personnelles que nous recueillons dépend de la façon dont vous interagissez avec nous et peut inclure les objectifs professionnels ou commerciaux énumérés ci-dessous. Lorsque nous faisons référence aux bases juridiques du traitement de vos données personnelles, ces bases ne s’appliquent que dans la mesure où la législation applicable en matière de protection des données exige que nous disposions d’une base légale pour un tel traitement. Lorsque nous agissons pour déterminer la finalité et les moyens de ce traitement de données et lorsque nous traitons des informations pour le compte de nos clients, vous devez les contacter pour en savoir plus sur leurs pratiques.
Exécution de nos services :
Nous et nos prestataires de services traiterons vos données personnelles aux fins de l’exécution de nos Services, y compris (i) pour exécuter vos commandes d’achat (par exemple, pour traiter les paiements, pour confirmer ou vous mettre à jour sur l’état de votre commande, etc.) ; (ii) lorsque vous créez un compte Everbridge, que vous vous inscrivez en tant qu’utilisateur (en tant qu’employé ou employeur) de nos services de gestion des risques liés aux voyages, de gestion de crise, de continuité d’activité ou de recherche de contrats, que vous vous inscrivez pour recevoir des notifications d’urgence, que vous soumettez un signalement anonyme ou d’autres messages à l’aide de nos services Nixle ou que vous recherchez des services d’assistance technique ou autres ; (iii) pour évaluer et résoudre les problèmes qui surviennent dans le cadre de l’utilisation de la Plateforme et d’autres Services ; et (iv) pour vous donner accès à des livres blancs, des webinaires et des ressources similaires.
Si vous avez une relation avec un client professionnel particulier d’Everbridge, ou si vous êtes un membre de la famille d’une telle personne, nous traiterons vos données personnelles comme l’autorise notre contrat avec ce client professionnel.
Nous nous appuyons sur plusieurs bases juridiques pour le traitement de vos données personnelles dans le but de fournir nos Services, comme suit :
Exécution d’un contrat
: Lors du traitement des informations d’identification du compte ; Coordonnées ; Informations professionnelles et d’emploi ; Informations démographiques ; les informations relatives à la carte de paiement, les détails de paiement et l’historique des achats ; Données relatives aux voyages ; Données sensibles ; et les données des enfants.
Consentement
: Lors du traitement des informations sur l’appareil, des données d’utilisation et des données de localisation précises collectées via des cookies non essentiels (lorsqu’un tel consentement est requis par la loi applicable) ; et, dans certaines circonstances, lors du traitement des Données sensibles.
Intérêts vitaux
: Lorsqu’il est dans votre intérêt vital ou dans celui d’une autre personne de traiter les données personnelles que nous conservons dans le cadre de nos Services.
Obligation légale
: Lorsque nous sommes tenus de traiter des données à caractère personnel afin de respecter nos obligations légales, par exemple à des fins comptables ou de prévention de la fraude.
Intérêts légitimes d’Everbridge
: Lors du traitement du Contenu soumis ; lorsque vous tirez des inférences à partir des données personnelles que vous fournissez. Vous pouvez avoir le droit de vous opposer au traitement de vos données personnelles sur la base des intérêts légitimes d’Everbridge ; Pour ce faire, veuillez consulter la section intitulée « Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée » ci-dessous.
Lorsque la loi l’exige, nous ne traiterons les données de « catégorie spéciale » qu’avec votre consentement explicite.
Communications :
Nous traiterons vos données personnelles contenues dans les enregistrements d’appels, les enregistrements d’e-mails et les journaux de chat afin de communiquer avec vous, y compris lorsque nous répondons à vos demandes et demandes de renseignements et lorsque nous vous demandons des commentaires par le biais d’enquêtes, d’avis sur les produits et de témoignages, ou d’autres messages.
Nous nous appuyons sur les bases juridiques suivantes pour le traitement de vos données personnelles à des fins de communication :
Exécution d’un contrat
: Lorsque vous avez fait une demande ou une demande de renseignements.
Intérêts légitimes d’Everbridge
: Où nous demandons des commentaires. Vous pouvez avoir le droit de vous opposer au traitement de vos données personnelles sur la base des intérêts légitimes d’Everbridge ; Pour ce faire, veuillez consulter la section intitulée « Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée » ci-dessous.
Publicité et marketing :
Nous pouvons traiter vos données personnelles à des fins de publicité et de marketing de nos Services en ligne et par e-mail, publipostage et téléphone, et en utilisant d’autres canaux de communication, y compris les plateformes de médias sociaux et les moteurs de recherche Internet.
Everbridge participe à la publicité ciblée (également appelée « publicité comportementale inter-contexte »), ce qui signifie que nous utilisons des sociétés de publicité tierces pour afficher des publicités numériques adaptées à vos intérêts individuels en fonction de vos activités en ligne, ainsi que pour fournir des services liés à la publicité tels que la diffusion de publicités, les rapports, l’attribution, l’analyse et les études de marché. Nous autorisons des sociétés tierces à collecter et à traiter certaines informations lorsque vous visitez notre Plateforme et, dans la mesure requise par la loi applicable, avec votre consentement à notre utilisation de cookies non essentiels. Ces informations peuvent être utilisées pour diffuser des publicités numériques pour les services Everbridge et pour les produits ou services d’autres sociétés.
De plus, si vous choisissez de communiquer ou de fournir des commentaires, des avis ou des témoignages, nous pouvons utiliser ces informations à des fins de publicité et de marketing et pour nous aider à améliorer nos produits et services.
Nous nous appuyons sur les bases juridiques suivantes pour le traitement de vos données personnelles à des fins publicitaires et de marketing :
Intérêts légitimes d’Everbridge :
Lorsque la loi applicable le permet, nous pouvons traiter vos données personnelles afin de vous contacter à des fins de marketing et de publicité, car il est dans notre intérêt légitime de promouvoir nos Services qui, selon nous, pourraient vous intéresser. Vous pouvez avoir le droit de vous opposer au traitement de vos données personnelles sur la base des intérêts légitimes d’Everbridge ; Pour ce faire, veuillez consulter la section intitulée « Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée » ci-dessous.
Consentement:
Lorsque la loi applicable l’exige, nous traiterons vos données personnelles afin de vous contacter à des fins de marketing et de publicité uniquement après que vous ayez consenti à recevoir nos communications marketing. Avec votre consentement, nous pouvons également inclure votre nom dans tout témoignage que vous fournissez.
Vous pouvez refuser (ou retirer votre consentement) à la réception de nos communications marketing, ou nous demander de retirer votre témoignage de la Plateforme ou de nos supports marketing, à tout moment, comme indiqué dans le paragraphe intitulé « Choix supplémentaires en matière de confidentialité » ci-dessous.
Comprendre nos clients et utilisateurs professionnels et maintenir et améliorer nos services :
Nous pouvons traiter vos données personnelles afin d’analyser votre utilisation de nos Services et les performances de nos Services. Par exemple, nous pouvons traiter les données personnelles que nous collectons lorsque vous interagissez avec notre Plateforme afin de maintenir et d’améliorer la Plateforme et de développer de nouvelles fonctionnalités ou de nouveaux services. De même, nous pouvons garder une trace des pages que vous visitez et de la manière dont vous utilisez la Plateforme et d’autres Services afin de déterminer s’il y a lieu d’apporter des modifications à notre Plateforme ou à d’autres Services, notamment en faisant appel à des tiers pour fournir des « cartes thermiques » et des enregistrements de session. Nous pouvons également vous envoyer des sondages ou solliciter vos commentaires par d’autres moyens. Nous pouvons, de temps à autre, agréger vos informations et celles d’autres utilisateurs pour nous aider à analyser les tendances, les habitudes d’achat et les préférences.
Nous nous appuyons sur les intérêts légitimes d’Everbridge comme base juridique pour le traitement des données personnelles à des fins de compréhension de nos clients professionnels et utilisateurs ; maintenir, modifier et améliorer nos Services ; et le développement de nouvelles fonctionnalités et de nouveaux services. Vous pouvez avoir le droit de vous opposer au traitement de vos données personnelles sur la base des intérêts légitimes d’Everbridge ; Pour ce faire, veuillez consulter la section intitulée « Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée » ci-dessous.
Personnalisation :
Nous pouvons traiter vos données personnelles afin d’enregistrer vos préférences et de personnaliser votre expérience sur notre Plateforme (par exemple, les paramètres de langue, les préférences en matière de communications marketing, etc.).
Nous nous appuyons sur les obligations contractuelles d’Everbridge comme bases juridiques pour le traitement de vos données personnelles à des fins de personnalisation (c’est-à-dire le « traitement nécessaire à l’exécution d’un contrat »).
Sécurité et prévention de la fraude :
Nous traiterons vos données personnelles si nécessaire pour protéger Everbridge, nos employés, nos clients et partenaires commerciaux et nos utilisateurs contre la fraude, les menaces de sécurité et d’autres activités illégales ou nuisibles.
Nous nous appuyons sur les intérêts légitimes et les obligations légales d’Everbridge comme bases juridiques pour le traitement de vos données personnelles à des fins de sécurité et de prévention de la fraude. Vous pouvez avoir le droit de vous opposer au traitement de vos données personnelles sur la base des intérêts légitimes d’Everbridge ; Pour ce faire, veuillez consulter la section intitulée « Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée » ci-dessous.
Obligations légales :
Nous traiterons vos données personnelles si nécessaire pour nous conformer aux exigences légales et réglementaires et pour répondre aux demandes des tribunaux ou d’autres autorités gouvernementales ou réglementaires.
4.   Comment partageons-nous les données personnelles avec des tiers ?
Nous pouvons partager des informations avec des tiers à des fins professionnelles ou commerciales. Par exemple:
Prestataires de services et partenaires commerciaux :
Nous travaillons en partenariat avec des fournisseurs de services tiers et des partenaires commerciaux pour nous aider dans de nombreux aspects de nos activités, y compris l’exécution des commandes d’achat, le traitement des paiements, l’analyse des intérêts et des activités de nos utilisateurs, la distribution et le traitement des enquêtes, la fourniture de services de télécommunication, la fourniture de certaines fonctionnalités sur notre plateforme (par exemple, notre chatbot), l’aide à la communication avec nos clients et utilisateurs professionnels et l’exploitation de notre entreprise de manière plus générale.
Entreprises clientes:
Si vous avez une relation avec une entreprise cliente particulière d’Everbridge (par exemple, votre employeur achète les services d’Everbridge au nom de ses employés), ou si vous êtes un membre de la famille d’une telle personne, nous pouvons partager vos données personnelles comme l’exige notre contrat avec cette entreprise client.
Partenaires publicitaires et marketing :
Nous travaillons en partenariat avec des tiers pour faciliter la publicité et le marketing de notre entreprise, y compris, par exemple, des sociétés de publicité et de marketing, des sociétés de publicité et de marketing, des sociétés de publicité et deréseaux publicitaires, les courtiers en données, les fournisseurs d’analyse de données, les sociétés de médias sociaux et les partenaires commerciaux.
Sociétés affiliées ou successeurs :
Nous pouvons divulguer certaines données personnelles à nos sociétés affiliées et filiales pour leur utilisation. Vos données personnelles peuvent également être transférées à une autre entité qui succède, ou a l’intention de succéder, à tout ou partie de notre entreprise dans le cadre d’une vente, d’une réorganisation, d’une consolidation ou d’une fusion.
Autres tiers :
Nous divulguerons des informations vous concernant à des tiers, y compris à des organismes gouvernementaux ou à des organismes d’application de la loi, lorsque nous le jugerons nécessaire pour nous conformer à la loi ou pour protéger Everbridge, nos clients et utilisateurs, nos employés ou le public en général. Par exemple, nous pouvons divulguer des données personnelles spécifiques si nous estimons raisonnablement qu’il est nécessaire de : (i) enquêter sur toute suspicion de fraude ou d’utilisation abusive de la Plateforme ou des Services ; (ii) protéger ou défendre les droits, la propriété ou les intérêts d’Everbridge, de nos employés, de nos clients et utilisateurs, ou les droits, la propriété ou les intérêts de nos partenaires commerciaux ou fournisseurs de services ; ou (iii) protéger la sécurité personnelle de nos employés, clients et utilisateurs, ou du public.
À votre demande ou selon vos instructions, ou pour protéger vos intérêts vitaux :
Nous divulguerons des informations vous concernant à d’autres tiers selon vos instructions ou avec votre consentement, ou si nécessaire pour protéger vos intérêts vitaux ou ceux d’une autre personne. Par exemple, certains de nos Services peuvent inclure le partage de votre nom et de vos coordonnées avec des fournisseurs de transport, des établissements médicaux et des bureaux d’immigration. Sauf en cas d’urgence (par exemple, lorsque nous devons fournir des informations immédiatement à un établissement médical), lorsque nous nous appuyons sur des intérêts vitaux comme base juridique pour un tel partage, nous agirons selon vos instructions ou vous demanderons votre consentement avant de partager vos informations.
Dans certains cas, des tiers peuvent restreindre le droit de traiter leurs informations à leurs propres fins et/ou dans le cadre de leurs propres avis de confidentialité.
Étant donné qu’Everbridge est une entreprise mondiale, les divulgations de données personnelles susmentionnées à des tiers peuvent impliquer le transfert transfrontalier de ces données personnelles, y compris – en ce qui concerne les données personnelles des résidents de l’EEA ou du Royaume-Uni – les transferts vers un pays tiers. Nous pouvons, par exemple, transférer les données personnelles des résidents du Royaume-Uni, de l’EEA, de l’Australie ou du Brésil à des tiers situés aux États-Unis, et vice versa. Pour plus d’informations sur ces transferts internationaux de données, y compris les mécanismes juridiques de ces transferts, veuillez consulter la section intitulée « Transferts internationaux de données » ci-dessous.
5. Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée
Les lois sur la protection des données de certains États et pays (y compris, par exemple, les lois sur la protection des données du Royaume-Uni, de l’UE, du Brésil et de l’Australie) accordent à leurs résidents des droits concernant l’utilisation de leurs données personnelles par les entreprises (parfois appelées « informations personnelles »). Vous pouvez contacter Everbridge en suivant les instructions ci-dessous pour nous demander de :
confirmer si nous traitons vos données personnelles ;
vous donner accès à vos données personnelles ou à une copie de vos données personnelles dans un format électronique couramment utilisé (ou les fournir dans ce format à un tiers selon vos instructions) ;
demander des informations sur les tiers avec lesquels vos données personnelles ont été partagées ;
modifier, mettre à jour ou corriger vos données personnelles ;
supprimer, bloquer ou anonymiser tout ou partie de vos données personnelles ;
limiter le traitement de vos données personnelles ; ou
refuser la vente de vos données personnelles ou le partage de vos données personnelles à des fins de publicité ciblée (ou « publicité comportementale inter-contexte »).
Lorsque notre traitement de vos données personnelles est basé sur notre intérêt légitime, vous pouvez également nous contacter pour vous opposer à notre traitement de vos données personnelles, et, lorsque notre traitement de vos données personnelles est basé sur votre consentement, vous pouvez (i) demander des informations concernant votre décision de refuser ce consentement et les conséquences de ce refus ; (ii) retirer votre consentement à un tel traitement ; et (iii) demander que nous supprimions vos données personnelles après avoir retiré votre consentement.
Si vous résidez en Californie, veuillez consulter la section intitulée « Droits à la vie privée en Californie » ci-dessous.
Bien que les droits ci-dessus ne soient pas toujours disponibles pour tout le monde, nous examinerons et répondrons à vos demandes rapidement, et autrement conformément à toutes les lois applicables. De plus, si vous choisissez d’exercer vos droits à la vie privée ou de faire les demandes ci-dessus, Everbridge ne vous traitera pas de manière discriminatoire et ne vous recevra pas un degré de service moindre de la part d’Everbridge.
Instructions pour soumettre des demandes. Vous pouvez faire l’une des demandes ci-dessus en visitant notre page de demande de personne concernée disponible ici https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-individual-rights-request-form-and-access-procedures/, ou en nous envoyant un e-mail à dsar.request@everbridge.com et en indiquant clairement la ou les demandes que vous souhaitez faire.
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-individual-rights-request-form-and-access-procedures/,
mailto:dsar.request@everbridge.com
Afin de nous assurer que vos données personnelles ne sont pas divulguées à une personne qui n’a pas le droit de les recevoir, et de veiller à ce que vos données personnelles ne soient pas supprimées ou modifiées par erreur, nous tenterons de vérifier que vous faites l’objet des données personnelles auxquelles vous demandez d’accéder,  supprimer ou corriger. Nous pouvons vous demander votre adresse e-mail et votre relation avec Everbridge (par exemple, un utilisateur de la Plateforme, un employé client, etc.). Nous comparerons les informations que vous fournissez à toutes les informations que nous pourrions avoir en notre possession afin de vérifier votre identité. Nous pouvons également vous contacter à l’adresse e-mail que vous avez fournie pour vous demander des informations supplémentaires concernant votre demande. Everbridge n’utilisera les informations recueillies dans le cadre du processus de demande qu’à des fins de vérification et de réponse à votre demande.
Nous confirmerons la réception de votre demande dans un délai de 10 jours ouvrables. Si vous ne recevez pas de confirmation dans le délai de 10 jours, veuillez nous envoyer un courriel à dsar.request@everbridge.com.
mailto:dsar.request@everbridge.com
Nous nous efforçons de répondre de manière substantielle à une demande vérifiable dans les 30 jours suivant sa réception. Si nous avons besoin de plus de temps (jusqu’à 30 jours supplémentaires), nous vous contacterons à l’adresse e-mail que vous avez fournie.
Agent autorisé
. Vous pouvez également choisir d’autoriser un agent à faire les demandes ci-dessus ou à exercer vos droits. Si vous faites appel à un agent, comme le permet la loi, nous prendrons des mesures pour vérifier l’autorisation de votre agent d’agir en votre nom et nous pourrons avoir besoin de plus d’informations pour assurer une vérification adéquate de votre identité et de votre autorisation ainsi que de celles de votre agent.
Veuillez noter qu’Everbridge peut ne pas être en mesure de répondre à votre demande si nous ne pouvons pas vérifier votre identité, ou l’identité de votre agent et l’autorité de faire la demande, et confirmer que les données personnelles vous concernent.
Procédure d’appel
. Vous pouvez faire appel de notre décision de refuser votre demande en nous envoyant un courriel à l’adresse dsar.request@everbridge.com en indiquant dans la ligne d’objet « Appel de la DSAR » et en indiquant clairement la ou les décisions que vous souhaitez appeler.
mailto:dsar.request@everbridge.com
Nous répondrons à votre appel dans les 45 jours suivant la réception de votre courriel, lequel répondra avec une explication de notre décision. Si vous n’êtes pas satisfait de notre décision en appel et que vous résidez dans l’un des États américains suivants, vous pouvez contacter l’autorité réglementaire indiquée pour cet État :
Virginie: Le procureur général de Virginie peut être contacté ici.
https://www.virginia.gov/agencies/office-of-the-attorney-general/
Connecticut: Le procureur général du Connecticut peut être contacté ici.
https://portal.ct.gov/AG/Contact-the-Attorney-Generals-Office/Contact-the-Attorney-Generals-Office
Colorado: Le procureur général du Colorado peut être contacté ici.
https://coag.gov/resources/
[CD1]
Si vous vivez dans un autre État des États-Unis, vous pouvez utiliser le site
Web situé ici
[CD2]
pour vous aider à trouver les coordonnées du procureur général de votre État.
https://www.usa.gov/state-attorney-general
Si vous vivez dans un autre État des États-Unis, vous pouvez utiliser le site
Web situé ici
pour vous aider à trouver les coordonnées du procureur général de votre État.
Résidents du Royaume-Uni/EEE
. Vous pouvez également avoir le droit de déposer une plainte auprès de nous, de l’autorité de contrôle pour les questions de protection des données au Royaume-Uni (l’Information Commissioner’s Office) ou, si vous êtes basé dans l’UE, de l’autorité de contrôle de votre État membre, que vous pouvez trouver ici.
https://ec.europa.eu/justice/article-29/structure/data-protection-authorities/index_en.htm
Résidents du Brésil
. Vous pouvez également avoir le droit de déposer une plainte officielle auprès de nous en utilisant les coordonnées indiquées dans la section « Nous contacter » du présent Avis de confidentialité. Si nous ne parvenons pas à résoudre votre problème dans un délai raisonnable, vous pouvez adresser une pétition à l’Autorité brésilienne de protection des données (ANPD) via le site Web de l’ANPD,
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br
.
Résidents de l’Australie
. Vous pouvez également avoir le droit de déposer une plainte officielle auprès de nous en utilisant les coordonnées indiquées dans la section « Nous contacter » du présent Avis de confidentialité. Si nous ne vous avons pas répondu dans un délai raisonnable, vous avez le droit, en vertu de la loi de 1988 sur la protection de la vie privée (Cth), de déposer une plainte auprès du Bureau du commissaire australien à l’information (OAIC). Vous pouvez contacter l’OAIC via le site Web de l’OAIC, www.oaic.gov.au, ou par téléphone au 1300 363 992.
http://www.oaic.gov.au/
Résidents de pays non énumérés ci-dessus
. Si vous résidez dans un pays qui ne figure pas dans la liste ci-dessus, vou pouvez également avoir le droit, en vertu de la loi sur la protection des données de votre pays, de déposer une plainte officielle aupres de nous en utilisant les coordonnées indiquées dans la section « Nous contacter » du présent Avis de confidentialité, ou en contactant l’autorité de protection des données de votre pays.
Autres choix en matière de protection de la vie privée :
Courriels
: Vous pouvez vous désabonner de nos e-mails marketing en cliquant sur le lien de désabonnement en bas de page de cet e-mail, ou en nous envoyant un e-mail à privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com ou en nous appelant au +1-781-373-9800.
mailto:privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com
Marketing téléphonique
: Vous pouvez retirer votre consentement à recevoir nos appels téléphoniques marketing en nous envoyant un e-mail à privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com ou en nous appelant au +1-781-373-9800.
mailto:privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com
Publipostage :
Vous pouvez nous demander de vous retirer de notre liste de diffusion en nous envoyant un e-mail à privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com ou en nous appelant au +1-781-373-9800.
mailto:privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com
Cookies et technologies similaires
:
Vous pouvez désactiver certains cookies tiers en suivant les instructions de votre appareil ou de votre navigateur ou en utilisant les outils de désactivation fournis par les groupes industriels suivants:de désactivation fournis par les groupes industriels suivants :
Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) : http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
Network Advertising Initiative (NAI) : http://optout.networkadvertising.org
http://optout.networkadvertising.org/
Veuillez noter que la désactivation des cookies est spécifique à l’appareil et au navigateur. Vous pouvez toujours voir des publicités ciblées de notre part lorsque vous utilisez un autre appareil ou navigateur, à moins que vous ne vous désinscriviez également de l’utilisation de cet appareil ou de ce navigateur.
De plus, si vous refusez nos cookies, vous risquez de rencontrer certains inconvénients dans votre utilisation de la Plateforme.
Application mobile Accès aux contenus et données de géolocalisation précises :
Si vous avez consenti à ce que nous traitions le contenu soumis que vous nous avez fourni en ajustant les paramètres de nos applications mobiles (par exemple, pour télécharger des photos ou des documents, ou pour créer des enregistrements vidéo ou audio), vous pouvez modifier ces autorisations (et cesser de nous autoriser à accéder à ces données) dans les paramètres de nos applications mobiles à tout moment. De même, vous pouvez modifier les paramètres de nos applications mobiles pour cesser de partager vos données de géolocalisation précises et/ou vos « données de mouvement » (que nous utilisons pour nous aider à déterminer votre géolocalisation précise) avec nous à tout moment.
Messages texte :
Si vous avez choisi de recevoir des messages texte dans le cadre d’un service, vous pouvez modifier vos préférences ou vous désabonner de ces messages texte en ajustant vos paramètres dans votre profil ou votre compte de service ; répondre à un texte d’Everbridge avec le mot STOP ; en nous envoyant un e-mail à privacy-unsubscribe@everbridge.com ; ou appelez-nous au +1-781-373-9800. Veuillez noter que nous n’utilisons pas les coordonnées fournies par les utilisateurs ou les clients professionnels à des fins de marketing ou de sensibilisation non liées aux Services. Les données d’inscription mobile ne seront pas partagées avec des tiers, sauf aux fins du dit service.
Témoignages. Lorsque vous fournissez un témoignage, nous pouvons l’inclure sur notre Plateforme ou dans nos documents marketing. Avec votre consentement, nous pouvons inclure votre nom à côté du témoignage. Vous pouvez nous demander de supprimer votre témoignage à tout moment en nous contactant à l’adresse marketing@everbridge.com.
mailto:marketing@everbridge.com
6.  Chatbots (chatbots)
Everbridge a intégré des fonctionnalités chatbot à ses sites Web qui vise à aider les utilisateurs à poser des questions générales et à demander des informations sur nos Services. Vos interactions avec un chatbot sont volontaires. Vous décidez seul d’interagir ou non avec le chatbot, et quelles informations vous nous divulguez sur vous-même lorsque vous choisissez d’interagir avec le chatbot. VOS CONVERSATIONS AVEC NOTRE CHATBOT PEUVENT ÊTRE ENREGISTRÉES PAR OU AU NOM D’EVERBRIDGE. Everbridge utilisera les informations que vous nous divulguez via le chatbot, ainsi que toutes les métadonnées associées, (i) pour répondre à vos demandes et requêtes, (ii) pour analyser, évaluer et améliorer nos produits et services, et (iii) à des fins de marketing et de publicité pour nos Services. Nous pouvons divulguer ces informations (y compris l’enregistrement de votre conversation avec le chatbot) comme décrit dans la section du présent Avis de confidentialité intitulée « Comment partageons-nous les données personnelles avec des tiers », y compris au fournisseur de services qui fournit la fonctionnalité du chatbot. Nous conserverons les informations collectées par le biais du chatbot et des métadonnées associées pour la période indiquée dans la section intitulée « Conservation » ci-dessous.
7. Enfants
Nous ne demandons ni ne recueillons sciemment ou délibérément des données personnelles auprès d’enfants, sauf si cela est nécessaire pour fournir nos Services au parent ou au tuteur de cet enfant, ou à l’employeur du parent ou du tuteur de cet enfant. Si vous pensez que ces données personnelles ont été fournies à Everbridge sans le consentement applicable, veuillez nous contacter à l’adresse privacy@everbridge.com.
mailto:privacy@everbridge.com
8.  Sécurité
La sécurité de vos données personnelles et des informations de nos clients professionnels est importante pour nous. Nous avons mis en place des mesures de protection conçues pour protéger raisonnablement vos données personnelles contre la perte accidentelle et contre l’accès, l’utilisation, l’altération et la divulgation non autorisés. Malheureusement, nous ne pouvons pas garantir la sécurité des informations fournies sur Internet ou stockées dans nos bases de données. Vos transmissions sont donc à vos risques et périls. Vous pouvez aider à protéger vos informations en faisant preuve de sélectivité et en évitant d’inclure inutilement des informations sensibles, en sélectionnant des mots de passe forts et uniques pour votre compte Everbridge et toutes les adresses e-mail associées, et en utilisant des fonctionnalités de sécurité telles que l’authentification unique et l’authentification multifacteur.
9.  Rétention
Nous conservons les données personnelles aussi longtemps que raisonnablement nécessaire aux fins pour lesquelles elles ont été collectées (par exemple, pour vous fournir les services que vous avez demandés), à moins que nous ne soyons tenus par la loi de les supprimer plus tôt ou de les conserver plus longtemps. Nous conservons également les données personnelles si nécessaire pour nous conformer à nos obligations légales, résoudre les litiges, poursuivre des intérêts commerciaux légitimes, effectuer des audits et protéger ou faire respecter nos droits.
10.  Transferts internationaux de données
Les données personnelles que nous traitons peuvent être transférées et/ou stockées sur nos serveurs ou sur des serveurs tiers dans un pays différent de celui où elles ont été collectées. Nous pouvons, par exemple, transférer les données personnelles des résidents du Royaume-Uni, de l’EEA, de l’Australie ou du Brésil vers les serveurs d’Everbridge, ou de nos fournisseurs de services ou partenaires, situés aux États-Unis, et vice versa. Les données personnelles peuvent également être traitées par du personnel qui travaille pour nous ou pour l’un de nos prestataires de services ou partenaires dans un pays différent du pays où les données ont été collectées. Certaines lois sur la protection des données exigent que les responsables du traitement des données mettent en place des garanties pour protéger les données personnelles transférées au-delà des frontières. Pour plus d’informations sur la conformité d’Everbridge aux lois sur la protection des données régissant les transferts transfrontaliers de données personnelles depuis le Royaume-Uni et l’UE, veuillez consulter la page de notre portail de confidentialité et de protection des données intitulée « Conformité aux exigences de transfert du Royaume-Uni et de l’UE » disponible ici https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-transfer-requirements-paper.
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-transfer-requirements-paper
UE-États-Unis et Suisse-États-Unis Cadre de protection des données
Everbridge, Inc. se conforme au cadre de protection des données UE-États-Unis (« DPF UE-ÉTATS-UNIS ») et à l’extension britannique au cadre DPF UE-ÉTATS-UNIS, ainsi qu’à l’accord Suisse-États-Unis. Cadre de protection des données (« Swiss-U.S. DPF ») tel qu’énoncé par le Département du Commerce des États-Unis. Everbridge, Inc. a certifié au Département du Commerce des États-Unis qu’elle adhère aux principes du cadre de confidentialité des données UE-États-Unis (« Principes du cadre de protection des données UE-États-Unis ») en ce qui concerne le traitement des données personnelles reçues de l’Union européenne et du Royaume-Uni en s’appuyant sur le DPF UE-États-Unis et l’extension du Royaume-Uni au DPF UE-États-Unis. Everbridge, Inc. a certifié au Département du Commerce des États-Unis qu’elle adhère à l’accord entre la Suisse et les États-Unis. Principes du cadre de protection des données (« Principes du DPF Suisse-États-Unis ») en ce qui concerne le traitement des données à caractère personnel reçues de la Suisse sur la base de l’accord Suisse-États-Unis.. En cas de conflit entre les termes de la présente Politique de confidentialité et les principes du DPF UE-États-Unis et/ou le Contrat Suisse-États-Unis. Principes DPF, les Principes prévaudront. Pour en savoir plus sur le programme Data Privacy Framework (DPF) et pour consulter notre certification, rendez-vous sur
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
Conforméméent au DPF  UE-Etats-Unis, à l’extension du Royaume-Uni au DPF UE-Etats-Unis et au contrat Suisse-Etats-Unis DPF , Everbridge Inc d’engage à résoudre les plaintes liées aux principes DPF concernant la collecte et l’utilisation de vos
http://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
Plaintes non résolues concernant notre traitement des données personnelles reçues sur la base du DPF UE-États-Unis, de l’extension du Royaume-Uni au DPF UE-États-Unis et du Contrat Suisse-États-Unis. DPF peut être référé à l’American Arbitration Association – International Centre for Dispute Resolution (AAA-ICDR) https://www.icdr.org/dpf, un fournisseur de solutions alternatives de règlement des différends basé aux États-Unis.
http://www.icdr.org/dpf
Si vous ne recevez pas d’accusé de réception de votre plainte liée aux principes DPF en temps opportun de notre part, ou si nous n’avons pas traité votre plainte liée aux principes DPF à votre satisfaction, veuillez consulter https://go.adr.org/dpf_irm.html pour plus d’informations ou pour déposer une plainte. Les services de l’AAA-ICDR vous sont fournis gratuitement.
Si votre plainte n’est pas résolue par nous ou par l’AAA-ICDR, Everbridge, Inc. peut, dans certaines circonstances, être obligée d’arbitrer les réclamations que vous intentez contre elle et de suivre les conditions énoncées à l’annexe I des principes DPF applicables, si vous invoquez un arbitrage exécutoire en remettant un avis à Everbridge, Inc. de votre réclamation et suivez les procédures énoncées à l’annexe I des principes DPF applicables, sous réserve des conditions qui y sont énoncées.
Les filiales américaines suivantes d’Everbridge, Inc. se conforment également au DPF UE-États-Unis, à l’extension britannique au DPF UE-États-Unis et à l’accord Suisse-États-Unis. DPF, et par conséquent, les déclarations, engagements et obligations ci-dessus s’appliquent également à ces sociétés :
Alarmpoint, Inc.
CNL Software, Inc.
Connexient, Inc.
Everbridge Securities Corporation
Microtech USA LLC
NC4 Secteur public, LLC
NC4, SARL
Previstar, Inc.
Red Sky Technologies, Inc.
SnapComms, Inc.
Le Groupe Anvil LLC
xMatters, Inc. (en anglais seulement)
xMatters Holdings, Inc. (en anglais seulement)
11.  Conditions d’utilisation du site Web
Les conditions d’utilisation des sites Web d’Everbridge et ses filiales sont disponibles ici
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-terms-of-use
.
12.  Liens vers d’autres plateformes ; Plateformes de médias sociaux
Notre Plateforme peut, de temps à autre, contenir des liens vers des sites Web détenus et exploités par des tiers (« Plateformes tierces »). Nous vous encourageons à consulter les politiques de confidentialité de ces plateformes tierces afin de comprendre comment ces sites Web collectent, utilisent et partagent vos informations. Nous ne sommes pas responsables des politiques de confidentialité ou d’autres contenus sur les plateformes tierces.
Si vous interagissez ou communiquez avec Everbridge sur une plateforme de médias sociaux (par exemple, LinkedIn, Facebook, Twitter, etc.), nous pouvons vous contacter par message direct ou utiliser d’autres outils de médias sociaux pour interagir avec vous. Dans ces cas, vos communications et interactions avec nous sont régies par le présent avis de confidentialité ainsi que par l’avis de confidentialité de la plateforme de médias sociaux que vous utilisez.
13.  Contactez-nous
N’hésitez pas à nous faire part de vos commentaires et de vos questions. Veuillez nous contacter par courriel au privacy@everbridge.com, par téléphone au +1-781-373-9800, ou par courrier à l’adresse suivante :
mailto:privacy@everbridge.com
Everbridge, Inc.
Attn: Responsable de la protection de la vie
8300 Boone BLVD, Suite 800
Vienna, Virginia
14.  Droits à la vie privée en Californie
Cette section contient des informations supplémentaires requises par la loi californienne sur la protection de la vie privée des consommateurs (telle que modifiée par la loi californienne sur les droits à la vie privée, et telle qu’elle peut être modifiée de temps à autre, et avec tous les règlements d’application, la « CCPA »).
Informations personnelles que nous recueillons
. Au cours des 12 derniers mois, nous avons pu collecter les catégories d’informations personnelles sur les consommateurs californiens énoncées dans la section du présent Avis de confidentialité intitulée « Données personnelles que nous traitons » ci-dessus, à des fins professionnelles et commerciales décrites dans la section intitulée « Comment utilisons-nous vos données personnelles» ci-dessus
Catégories de sources
. Nous avons recueilli les informations personnelles mentionnées ci-dessus à partir des sources décrites dans la section du présent avis de confidentialité intitulée « Comment collectons-nous vos données personnelles » ci-dessus.
Informations personnelles divulguées à des fins commerciales
. Nous pouvons avoir divulgué les informations personnelles mentionnées ci-dessus aux tiers énumérés dans la section du présent Avis de confidentialité intitulée « Comment partageons-nous les données personnelles avec des tiers » aux fins énoncées dans cette section et dans la section intitulée « Comment utilisons-nous vos données personnelles  » ci-dessus.
Informations personnelles « vendues » ou « partagées »
. Nous pouvons partager certaines catégories d’informations personnelles avec des tiers à des fins de marketing et de publicité, ce qui peut constituer une « vente » ou un « partage », tel que ces termes sont définis dans la CCPA. Une telle « vente » ou « partage » n’inclut pas les informations sur les personnes dont nous savons qu’elles sont âgées de moins de 16 ans.
Au cours des douze (12) derniers mois, Everbridge peut avoir « vendu » ou « partagé » les catégories d’informations personnelles énumérées ci-dessous avec les catégories de tiers énumérées ci-dessous. Pour obtenir des instructions sur la façon de refuser cette vente ou ce partage, veuillez consulter la section intitulée « Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée » ci-dessus.
Catégories d’informations personnelles
:
Informations sur l’appareil
Données d’utilisation
Données de localisation non précises
Coordonnées
Informations sur la profession et l’emploi
Données démographiques
Inférences
D’autres informations vous concernant qui sont liées aux informations
personnelles ci-dessus « partagées » ou « vendues » aux catégories de tiers suivantes :
Sociétés de publicité et de marketing
Réseaux publicitaires
Courtiers en données
Fournisseurs d’analyse de données
Entreprises de médias sociaux
Partenaires commerciaux
Informations personnelles sensibles
. Everbridge peut collecter et traiter des catégories d’informations personnelles sensibles si nécessaire à la fourniture de nos Services. Nous n’utilisons ni ne divulguons d’informations personnelles sensibles à des fins autres que celles énoncées dans Cal. Reg. tit. 11 § 7027(m).
Une explication de vos droits
. Le CCPA accorde aux résidents de Californie des droits spécifiques concernant leurs informations personnelles. Veuillez consulter la section du présent Avis de confidentialité intitulée « Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée » ci-dessus pour obtenir une explication de vos droits et de la manière dont vous pouvez les exercer. En plus des droits énoncés dans cette section, les résidents de Californie peuvent nous contacter à tout moment pour nous demander de divulguer des détails supplémentaires concernant leurs informations personnelles, y compris les catégories d’informations personnelles, les catégories de sources à partir desquelles les informations personnelles ont été collectées, les fins professionnelles ou commerciales de la collecte, de la vente ou du partage de vos informations personnelles, les catégories de tiers à qui nous avons divulgué des informations personnelles ; et les informations personnelles spécifiques que nous avons collectées à votre sujet. Les instructions pour nous demander de divulguer ces informations sont énoncées dans la section du présent avis de confidentialité intitulée « Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée » ci-dessus.
15. Résidents du Nevada
Si vous êtes un consommateur du Nevada, vous avez le droit de demander à une entreprise de ne pas vendre vos données personnelles à d’autres parties contre une contrepartie monétaire. Ce droit s’applique même si vos données personnelles ne sont pas actuellement vendues. Si vous souhaitez exercer ce droit, vous pouvez en faire la demande en nous envoyant un e-mail à l’adresse privacy@everbridge.com ou en nous écrivant à l’adresse suivante :
mailto:privacy@everbridge.com
Everbridge, Inc., 25 Corporate Drive, Suite 400, Burlington, MA 01803, à l’attention de : Responsable de la protection de la vie privée.
16.  Résidents du Royaume-Uni et de l’EEE – Article 14 Avis de confidentialité
Everbridge peut, de temps à autre, obtenir des données personnelles auprès d’une source autre que celle de la personne concernée directement (ou d’un sous-traitant ou d’un partenaire commercial qui les a obtenues directement auprès de la personne concernée pour le compte d’Everbridge), y compris, par exemple, auprès de coordinateurs d’événements ou de conférences, de fournisseurs de services de génération de prospects et de partenaires commerciaux de confiance avec lesquels Everbridge s’engage dans des opportunités de marketing croisé. Dans ces circonstances, Everbridge peut obtenir vos coordonnées, y compris votre nom, votre titre et le nom de votre employeur.
Les autres sections du présent Avis de confidentialité, y compris celles intitulées « Comment utilisons-nous vos données personnelles », « Comment partageons-nous les données personnelles avec des tiers » et « Vos droits et vos choix en matière de protection de la vie privée » s’appliquent aux données personnelles que nous obtenons dans les circonstances énoncées dans la présente section.
Request a Demo
By clicking “Accept All Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts.
Cookies Settings
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.everbridge.com/about/legal/everbridge-privacy-practices-for-medical:
Skip to main content
Discover insights from our 2025 Global Enterprise Resilience Report
Download now
EB_Anvil – Notice of Privacy Practices for Medical Information_web4
Request a Demo
By clicking “Accept All Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts.
Cookies Settings
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 1
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 2
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
Please wait while application initialize...
;